Illinois, session 104th, HB4512.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Cook County Forest Preserve District Act is 5amended by changing Section 14 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 810/14)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 6417)7    Sec. 14. The board, as corporate authority of a forest 8preserve district, shall have power to pass and enforce all 9necessary ordinances, rules and regulations for the management 10of the property and conduct of the business of such district. 11The president of such board shall have power to appoint a 12secretary and an assistant secretary, and treasurer and an 13assistant treasurer and such other officers and such employees 14as may be necessary, all of whom, excepting the treasurer and 15attorneys, shall be under civil service rules and regulations, 16as provided in Section 17 of this Act. The assistant secretary 17and assistant treasurer shall perform the duties of the 18secretary and treasurer, respectively, in case of death of 19said officers or when said officers are unable to perform the 20duties of their respective offices because of absence or 21inability to act. All contracts for supplies, material, or 22work involving an expenditure by forest preserve districts in 23excess of $60,000 for supplies or materials, $30,000 for work,   HB4512 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 18160 RTM 31599 b1or a lower amount for any contract for supplies, materials, or 2work, if required by board policy, shall be let to the lowest 3responsible bidder, after due advertisement, excepting work 4requiring personal confidence or necessary supplies under the 5control of monopolies, where competitive bidding is 6impossible, or as otherwise provided in the Forest Preserve 7District and Conservation District Design-Build Authorization 8Act. Contracts for supplies, material or work involving an 9expenditure of $30,000 or less may be let without advertising 10for bids, but whenever practicable, at least 3 competitive 11bids shall be obtained before letting such contract. 12Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section, a forest 13preserve district may establish procedures to comply with 14State and federal regulations concerning affirmative action 15and the use of small businesses or businesses owned by 16minorities or women in construction and procurement contracts. 17All contracts for supplies, material or work shall be signed 18by the president of the board or by any such other officer as 19the board in its discretion may designate.20    Salaries of employees shall be fixed by ordinance.21(Source: P.A. 102-460, eff. 6-1-22.) 22    Section 10. The River Conservancy Districts Act is amended 23by changing Section 16 as follows: 24    (70 ILCS 2105/16)  (from Ch. 42, par. 399)  HB4512 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 18160 RTM 31599 b1    Sec. 16. All contracts for supplies, materials, or work 2other than professional services, to be done by such 3conservancy district, the expense of which will exceed $60,000 4for supplies or materials and $30,000 for work other than 5professional services, or a lower amount for any contract for 6supplies, materials, or work, if required by board policy, 7$10,000, shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder 8therefor upon not less than thirty days' public notice of the 9terms and conditions upon which the contract is to be let, 10having been given by publication in a newspaper of general 11circulation published in said district, and the said board 12shall have the power and authority to reject any and all bids, 13and readvertise.14    And in all other respects such contract shall be entered 15into and the performance thereof controlled by the provisions 16of an Act entitled "An Act concerning local improvements," 17approved June 14, 1897, in force July 1, 1897, and amendments 18thereto as nearly as may be; provided, that contracts may be 19let for making proper and suitable connections between the 20mains and outlets of the respective sewers in said district, 21with any conduits, main pipe or pipes that may be constructed 22by such conservancy district.23(Source: P.A. 101-241, eff. 8-9-19.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.